Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 2

Rail Service

7-56-201. Establishment of authority — General powers.

Any municipality or any county or any combination of municipalities and counties may establish an authority to provide for the continuation of rail service within the area of the governments establishing the authority.

An authority shall come into existence under the terms of this part when any government or combination of governments specified in subsection (a) vote by majority vote of its governing body to establish an authority. Evidence of such authorization shall be proclaimed and countersigned by the presiding officer of each participating county or city and certified by such officer to the secretary of state. The governing bodies of all governments voting to become members of an authority shall indicate their willingness to appropriate sufficient funds to provide for the initial administration of the authority as a part of the authorization process.

Within the region of the authority, it may acquire, construct, operate, maintain, and dispose of railroad facilities, properties, and equipment, and may, in addition to continuing railroad service, provide any other rail service in the region as it is needed and feasible.

Acts 1983, ch. 221, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. The rail service authorities, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2028. See §§4-29-112,4-29-249.

Acts 2015, ch. 146, § 3 provided that the representatives of the Rail Service Authorities and related state rail authorities shall appear before the Government Operations Joint Evaluation Committee on Commerce, Labor, Transportation and Agriculture no later than November 1, 2015, in order to update the Committee regarding the status of pending litigation related to the state’s Short Line Equity Fund.

Cross-References. Assessment of property for tax purposes, title 67, ch. 5, part 13.

Situs of property for tax purposes, §67-5-502.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Carriers, § 58; 23 Tenn. Juris., Street Railroads, § 2.

Law Reviews.

Public Utilities — Municipal Corporations — Extraterritorial Control of Street Railways, 1 Vand. L. Rev. 464 (1947).

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

7-56-202. Nature of powers.

The acquisition, construction, operation and maintenance of such properties and facilities are hereby declared to be public and governmental functions with the authorities acting as agencies and instrumentalities of the creating and participating counties and municipalities. The powers granted in this part, in connection with this part, are declared to be public and corporate purposes and matters of public necessity.

Acts 1983, ch. 221, § 2; 1996, ch. 599, § 1.

7-56-203. Organization of authority.

The organization of the authority shall be as follows:

The authority shall be governed by a board of directors;

Membership of the board of directors shall consist of:

The county mayor or the mayor in a county with a metropolitan form of government or their designees of each county becoming a member of the authority;

The mayor or the mayor's designee of each city not already a member of the authority under subdivision (a)(2)(A) becoming a member of the authority; and

One (1) member to be selected by the governing body of each county and city becoming a member of the authority;

The term of each selected member shall be prescribed by the governing body making the selection;

In the event that a single governmental jurisdiction in counties having a population of not less than twenty-seven thousand one hundred (27,100) nor more than twenty-seven thousand four hundred (27,400), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census, establishes an authority, then the membership of the board of directors shall include those persons serving pursuant to subdivision (a)(2)(A) and shall also include three (3) additional members. Such additional three (3) members shall be selected by the governing body of the respective city or county; and

In the event any county with a metropolitan form of government with a population of more than one hundred thousand (100,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census, participates in an authority, the county shall have five (5) members on the board of directors of the authority. The members shall be the mayor or the designee of the mayor; one (1) member selected by the county legislative body; one (1) member from the county department of public works administration; and two (2) members appointed by the mayor, one (1) of whom shall be a representative of an industry served by the authority;

Subdivision (a)(3)(A) does not apply to any railroad authority in which a county with a population of not less than twenty-seven thousand one hundred (27,100) nor more than twenty-seven thousand four hundred (27,400), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census, participates;

In the event that a single governmental jurisdiction in counties having a population of not less than twenty-seven thousand one hundred (27,100) nor more than twenty-seven thousand four hundred (27,400), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census, establishes or participates in an authority, then the membership of the board of directors shall include those persons serving pursuant to subdivision (a)(2)(A) and shall also include three (3) additional members. The three (3) additional members shall be selected as follows:

One (1) member shall be selected by each person serving pursuant to subdivision (a)(2)(A)(i) from a list of entities located in the official's county who are members of an association representing the entities utilizing the rail services provided by the authority; and

One (1) member shall be selected jointly by both persons serving pursuant to subdivision (a)(2)(A)(i) from a list of a minimum of two (2) persons submitted by the chair of the association representing the entities utilizing the rail service provided by the authority; and

The board of director positions created by subdivision (a)(4) shall not be subject to the residency requirement of subsection (c).

In the event of failure to elect a successor to any member of the board, the member whose term has expired shall continue to serve until such member's successor has been duly elected as provided in subdivision (b)(2).

In the event of the death or resignation of a member of the board, or the member's inability to serve prior to the expiration of the member's term, the member's successor shall be elected for the unexpired term by the remaining members of the board within thirty (30) days of the event.

Any person at least twenty-five (25) years of age who has resided within the boundaries of the authority for a period of at least one (1) year immediately preceding such person's election shall be eligible to serve as a member of the board. Any director who ceases to regularly reside within the boundaries of the authority shall automatically become ineligible to serve in such office.

Before entering upon their duties, all directors shall take and subscribe to an oath of office, as provided by the constitution and law for county and city officers. Copies of the oath of each director shall be filed with the county clerk of the applicable county.

A majority of the directors shall constitute a quorum and the directors shall act by vote of a majority present at any meeting attended by a quorum, and vacancies among the directors shall not affect their power and authority so long as a quorum remains. Within thirty (30) days after their election as provided in subsection (a), the directors shall hold a meeting to elect a chair.

The directors shall hold meetings at such times and places as the directors may determine. Special meetings may be called and held upon such notice and in such manner as the board of directors may, by resolution, determine.

Save as otherwise expressly provided, the board of directors shall establish its own rules of procedure.

The directors shall designate a secretary and a treasurer, or one (1) person as secretary-treasurer, and such person need not be a director. The secretary shall attend all regular and special meetings and keep minutes of such meetings. The minutes of meetings shall be available for inspection by the public at the office of the authority, at all reasonable times.

The board of directors, by resolution, shall require the treasurer or the secretary-treasurer to execute a bond with an approved corporate surety, in such amount as the board may specify, for the faithful performance of the treasurer's or secretary-treasurer's duties and the accounting of all moneys and revenues that may come into the treasurer's or secretary-treasurer's hands. Such bond shall be filed with the secretary of state.

The board of directors, by resolution, may require all other subordinate officers, or employees, to execute such fidelity bonds for the faithful performance of their duties and the accounting of funds that may come to their hands, in such an amount, with such conditions and such sureties, as the board of directors may determine.

All members of the board of directors shall serve without compensation except by specific authorization by the board, upon vote by two-thirds (2/3) of the board; provided, however, that the members may receive any per diem allowance that may be appropriated for such director by the governing body of the county or city electing a director. Reasonable expenses incurred by members of the board while engaged in the business of the authority are subject to reimbursement by the authority. The board of directors may set reasonable compensation for officers of the authority consistent with their respective responsibilities, which may take into consideration such officer's responsibilities relating to financing of projects and facilities of the authority, in addition to other responsibilities.

The directors shall be indemnified by the authority for any liability they might incur while acting in such capacity, other than for culpable negligence.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, the directors shall be removable only for good cause, and after preferment of charges, as provided by law for county officers.

Acts 1983, ch. 221, § 3; 1987, ch. 177, § 1; 1994, ch. 944, §§ 1, 2; 1996, ch. 938, §§ 1-4; 2004, ch. 672, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. Removal of county officers, Tenn. Const., art. VII, § 1.

7-56-204. Employment of assistance and advisors.

The directors shall be authorized to employ and fix the compensation of architects, attorneys, engineers, superintendents, consultants, professional advisors, and other subordinate officers and employees, as may be necessary for the efficient management and operation of the authority and its facilities. Such persons shall continue in the employment of the authority at the will and pleasure of the board of directors. Such employment or contracts shall conform to the statutes, regulations and procedures to which counties must generally adhere in making such transactions.

Acts 1983, ch. 221, § 4.

7-56-205. Powers and duties of directors.

The directors have the following duties and powers, and in exercising such duties and powers, except as otherwise specifically authorized in this section, shall abide by all statutes, regulations and procedures to which counties must generally adhere in making such transactions, to:

Acquire, construct, purchase, operate, maintain, replace, repair, rebuild, extend, and improve within the boundaries of the authority the properties and facilities described in § 7-56-201, and make such properties and facilities available to any firm, person, public or private corporation, to any other shipper, consignee, or carrier, and charge for their use and for any and all services performed by the authority;

Accept donations to the authority of cash, lands or other property to be used in the furtherance of the purpose of this part;

Accept grants, loans or other financial assistance from the state, any county or municipality and any federal, state, county or municipal agency or authority, or other aid for the operation, acquisition or improvement of the properties and facilities of the authority;

Purchase, rent, lease, or otherwise acquire any and all kinds of property, real, personal or mixed, tangible or intangible, whether or not subject to mortgages, liens, charges, or other encumbrances, for the authority, that, in the judgment of the authority directors, is necessary or convenient to carry out the purpose of the authority. In exercising the powers granted in this subdivision (4), the directors shall abide by all statutes, regulations and procedures to which counties must conform in such matters;

Acquire property that is suitable for use by industries requiring access to any railroad track owned, operated, or subsidized by the authority;

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the directors may make contracts and execute instruments containing such covenants, terms, and conditions as, in the judgment of the directors, may be necessary, proper or advisable for the purpose of issuing bonds and notes, and entering into leases and lease-purchase agreements, for or in aid of the acquisition or improvement of the authority's property and facilities; and may make all other contracts and execute all other contracts and execute all other instruments, including, but not limited to, licenses, long or short term leases, lease-purchase agreements, bonds, notes, reimbursement agreements, mortgages and deeds of trust and other agreements relating to property and facilities under its jurisdiction, and involving the financing, construction, operation, maintenance, repair and improvement of the property and facilities, or the acquisition of property for railroad purposes, as in the judgment of the board of directors may be necessary, proper, or advisable for the furtherance of the authority's business and in the full exercise of the powers granted in this section; and the directors are authorized to carry out and perform the covenants, terms, and conditions of all such contracts or instruments;

Establish schedules of tolls, fees, rates, charges, and rentals for the use of the properties and facilities under its jurisdiction, and for services that it may render;

Enter upon any lands and premises for the purpose of making surveys, soundings, and examination in connection with the acquisition, improvement, operation or maintenance of any of the facilities of the authority;

Promulgate and enforce such rules and regulations as the board of directors may deem proper for the orderly administration of the authority and the efficient operation of its facilities. In exercising the powers granted in this subdivision (9), the directors shall abide by all statutes, regulations and procedures to which counties must conform in such matters;

Do all acts and things necessary or deemed necessary or convenient to carry out the powers expressly given in this part. This subdivision (10) shall not be construed to authorize the directors, in doing all things necessary and convenient, to conduct the administrative and business affairs of the authority in a manner inconsistent with the statutes, regulations and procedures governing such matters in county government;

Make grants or loans to public or private rail common carrier operators to ensure continued rail service, subject, if such grant or loan is made from public funds, to the approval of the funding entity; provided, that no revenues generated from the transportation equity fund, which is described in § 67-6-103(b), other than revenues generated from taxes on fuels used for railways, shall be used for grants or loans to private or public rail common carrier operators. No state funds shall be used for this purpose without a finding by the commissioner of transportation that such funds are needed in the public interest, and that sufficient conditions shall be imposed on the recipients to protect the public interest and investment. Such conditions shall include, but not necessarily be limited to, provisions to ensure continuation of service, adequate maintenance, minimum levels of service, and in the case of grants, repayment of a proportionate share of state funds if the railroad is ever sold or service is discontinued;

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, acquire, hold, own and dispose of property, real and personal, tangible and intangible, or interests in property, in its own name, subject to mortgages, deeds of trust, or other liens or otherwise and to pay for the property in cash or on credit through installment payments, and to secure the payment of all or any part of any installment obligations in connection with any acquisition with property, tangible or intangible or revenues of the authority, in accordance with the provisions set forth in this section and without regard to the statutes, regulations and procedures to which counties must generally adhere;

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, contract debts, borrow money, issue bonds, notes and other evidences of indebtedness, and enter into lease-purchase agreements to acquire, construct, improve, furnish, equip, extend, operate or maintain the properties and facilities described in § 7-56-201, or any part of the properties and facilities, or to provide the authority's share of the funding for any joint undertaking or project, and to assume and agree to pay any indebtedness incurred for any of the purposes listed in this subdivision (13), in accordance with the provisions set forth in this section and without regard to the statutes, regulations and procedures to which counties must generally adhere; and

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, enter into joint ventures and cooperative arrangements with one or more natural persons, firm, association, corporation, other governmental agency, limited liability company, business trust or partnership, including the formation of a partnership, limited liability company or not-for-profit corporation to accomplish any of the purposes set forth in this section or to exercise any of the powers set forth in this section without regard to the statutes, regulations and procedures to which counties must generally adhere.

Acts 1983, ch. 221, § 5; 1988, ch. 844, §§ 1, 2; 1994, ch. 1006, § 2; 2004, ch. 672, §§ 2-5.

Code Commission Notes.

The following former last two sentences of subdivision (11) were deemed obsolete by the code commission in 2005: “Such funds as may be available from the tax revenues allocated to the department of transportation not to exceed two million eight hundred thousand dollars ($2,800,000) after July 1, 1995, shall be deposited in the transportation equity trust fund and shall be used by the department of transportation for the purpose of constructing, repairing, rebuilding, replacing and improving bridges and spans on public railways. This provision earmarking and allocating all sales tax revenues from all railway carriers for the purpose of public railway bridge rehabilitation shall begin on July 1, 1995, and expire on June 30, 1999;”.

7-56-206. Administration of properties and facilities.

Except as otherwise expressly provided in this part, the directors shall have full and exclusive control of and responsibility for the administration of properties and facilities constructed or acquired pursuant to this part; provided, that the authority may lease or license lands or facilities under its jurisdiction for operation by private persons or corporations. This section shall not be construed to authorize the directors to exercise such authority in a manner inconsistent with the statutes, regulations and procedures governing such matters in county government.

Acts 1983, ch. 221, § 6.

7-56-207. Condemnation.

The authority is hereby authorized and empowered to condemn, in the name of the authority, any land, easements, or rights-of-way in the boundaries of the authority that, in the opinion of the board of directors, are necessary or convenient to carry out the purposes of this part; provided, that condemnation of any land, easements, or rights-of-way in which railroad lines are located shall be limited to such lines that are abandoned or proposed for abandonment by operating railroads in Tennessee as were contained in the previous provisions in Category I, 49 CFR 1121.20, as of 1983. Title to property so condemned shall be taken by and in the name of the authority, and the property shall thereafter be entrusted to the authority for the purposes of this chapter. Such condemnation proceedings shall be in accordance with title 29, chapters 16 and 17. Where title to any property sought to be condemned is defective, it shall be passed by the judgment or decree of the court. Where condemnation proceedings become necessary, the court in which any such proceedings are filed shall, upon application by the authority, and upon posting of a bond with the clerk of the court in such amount as the court may deem commensurate with the value of the property, order that a writ of possession shall issue immediately, or as soon and upon such terms as the court, in its discretion, may deem proper and just.

Acts 1983, ch. 221, § 7.